Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF994.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; PARENTCHILD+ PROGRAM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Children, Youth, and Families. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Children, Youth, and Families in the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin ParentChild+ program. new text end new text begin (a) For a grant to the ParentChild+ program: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,800,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,800,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) The ParentChild+ program must use the grant to implement its evidence-based and research-validated early childhood literacy and school readiness program for children ages 16 months to four years. The program must be implemented at existing ParentChild+ program locations, including Cass County, Hennepin County, and Rice County, and the cities of Rochester and St. Cloud, or at any new rural, suburban, or urban locations. new text end new text begin (c) The base is $1,800,000 for fiscal year 2028 and later. new text end